udm.dic
антирелигиозной/A1A2
берекеттэм/A1A2
быдӟи/A1A2D1
ваё/A1A2
вогыриё-вогыриё/A1A2
генеральной/A1A2
гургес/A1A2D1
двухгодичной/A1A2
етӥно/A1A2
заро/A1A2
ӟечгес/A1A2D1
именной/A1A2
калляла/A1A2
капчигес/A1A2D1
кирзовой/A1A2
кото/A1A2
курико/A1A2
лазег/A1A2D1
лейтенантской/A1A2
льготной/A1A2
миллиметръем/A1A2
мыкрес/A1A2D1
наградной/A1A2
нунываем/A1A2
огкузьда/A1A2D1
ошеттэм/A1A2
пилемтэм/A1A2
поточной/A1A2
путевой/A1A2
сабыр/A1A2
сӥялэс/A1A2
сьӧдпыръем/A1A2
сэсо-кабо/A1A2D1
тӧдьыпыр/A1A2
тыръем/A1A2
фактической/A1A2
чарпут/A1A2
чылкыт/A1A2D1N2
шайтано/A1A2
щедрой/A1A2
яблочной/A1A2
азьтӥ/B1
азям/B1D1
беразы/B1D1
бере/B1C1
бертӥ/B1
берысь/B1N2
бордозь/B1
бӧрсьы/B1
быдӟа/B1
вадьсытӥ/B1
вӧзозь/B1
вылады/B1D1
вылтӥз/B1D1
вылысь/B1
дӥняд/B1D1
дорын/B1
дурысь/B1
дыръя/B1C1
дырысь/B1
ёростӥ/B1
ёрсысен/B1
йылтӥ/B1
кадь/B1P1D1A1A2
кемысен/B1
котыртӥ/B1
куспазы/B1D1
куспысь/B1
мурда/B1
пӧлады/B1D1
понна/B1C1
поннады/B1D1
пулсы/B1
пумитам/B1D1
серкам/B1D1
сьӧрады/B1
сьӧркысь/B1
сэрен/B1
улсозь/B1
улэ/B1
урдэсад/B1D1
шорад/B1D1
шорын/B1
а/C1P1
агар/C1
айкась/C1
будьто/C1P1
если/C1
ито/C1
ке/C1P1
либо/C1
не/C1
но/C1I1P1
ной/C1
нош/C1P1
однако/C1
раз/C1
сокутэк/C1
яке/C1P1
азьланьын/D1B1
али/D1P1C1
аль/D1P1C1
асат/D1
бервылаз/D1B1
будто-ке/D1
валлапаласен/D1
вожен-вожен/D1
вылтӥ/D1B1
вылытӥ/D1
гылкак/D1
живо-два/D1
зыл/D1
каплиен-каплиен/D1
куараен/D1
кыдёкозь/D1
кызьы-ке/D1M1
лекос/D1
макем/D1C1
маркем/D1C1
мыддорин/D1
нуналын-нуналын/D1
огазе/D1M1
огинэн/D1
огшуккемен/D1
олокудкеме/D1M1
отӥяз/D1M1
палагес/D1
пудоен-тырлыкен/D1
сапак/D1
соняӵоже/D1M1
сэрыт/D1A1A2
татысь/D1A1A2M1
толэзьскын/D1
туннэ/D1A1A2
укмысой/D1
улланьын/D1B1
уш/D1A1A2
чуак/D1
шып/D1Z1
эркам/D1B1
янгыштэм/D1A1A2
Алов/F1
Асланов/F1
Баранников/F1
Белозёров/F1
Богаченко/F1
Бритвин/F1
Бызгин/F1
Венчаковых/F1
Вормс/F1
Гарвардт/F1
Гогулин/F1
Гречанов/F1
Данин/F1
Додонов/F1
Дюмин/F1
Жехов/F1
Заусаев/F1
Игнатенок/F1
Калкутин/F1
Кашежев/F1
Клюкин/F1
Компаниец/F1
Кострюков/F1
Крутенев/F1
Кутепов/F1
Лекомцев/F1
Лубышев/F1
Макшин/F1
Минченков/F1
Нежельченко/F1
Павлеков/F1
Погодицкий/F1
Рагузин/F1
Савченко/F1
Сквирский/F1
Стяжков/F1
Третьяков/F1
Феррелл/F1
Хэзлитт/F1
Шадриных/F1
Штайнбах/F1
Яценко/F1
Аднер/F3
Александрина/F3
Аляр/F3
Анна-Мария/F3
Армине/F3
Ахлиман/F3
Блейк/F3
Ванадий/F3
Виганторп/F3
Власта/F3
Гасан/F3
Гонсало/F3
Дан/F3
Джана/F3
Доменик/F3
Елу/F3
Зарифа/F3
Изосим/F3
Ионас/F3
Каарина/F3
Качырий/F3
Костик/F3
Лали/F3
Лёва/F3
Люба/F3
Мансур/F3
Матвей/F3
Мила/F3
Молдан/F3
Настаси/F3
Нурдаль/F3
Ондроп/F3
Парвана/F3
Прокови/F3
Рандольф/F3
Робин/F3
Сарра/F3
Стапан/F3
Трейси/F3
Фома/F3
Шамо/F3
Энди/F3
Агеевич/F5
Алексеевич/F5
Анарович/F5
Анфиногенович/F5
Артемович/F5
Ахмедович/F5
Бронович/F5
Вахтангович/F5
Винцентович/F5
Габриельевич/F5
Гегамович/F5
Горимирович/F5
Демьянович/F5
Дэкуевич/F5
Ермилович/F5
Зиновьевич/F5
Илмасович/F5
Ипатьевич/F5
Калистратович/F5
Кириллович/F5
Куприянович/F5
Лндревич/F5
Манасович/F5
Мигранович/F5
Мойсеевич/F5
Намидович/F5
Ноевич/F5
Оттович/F5
Поликарпович/F5
Разокхонович/F5
Рашитович/F5
Рубэнович/F5
Саликович/F5
Селиверстович/F5
Стефанович/F5
Тимурович/F5
Фалалеевич/F5
Фирдаусович/F5
Харисович/F5
Эдалетович/F5
Эренценович/F5
Яромирович/F5
бызьыса/G1D1
бызьытэк/G1
валатэк/G1
ваменскыса/G1D1
вамышъяса/G1D1
вераса-вератэк/G1
визаськыса/G1D1
вожпотыса/G1D1
выжыятъяса/G1D1
гордэктытозь/G1
дӥсьтыса/G1D1
дӥсьтытэк/G1
дугдылытэк/G1
дыртыса/G1D1
дыртытэк/G1
жадьылытэк/G1
жадьытозь/G1
жадьытэк/G1
жаляса-жалятэк/G1
жалятэк/G1
зуййы/G1
кӧсатытозь/G1
куспатыса/G1D1
луытозь/G1
малпаськытэк/G1
медъяськыса/G1D1
мыльытозь/G1
пиктыса/G1
пӧяса/G1D1
ратласа/G1D1
сиытозь-юытозь/G1
тупаса/G1D1
турнатэк/G1
тэтчаса/G1D1
уйлатэк/G1
улыса-улыса/G1D1
шальккыса/G1
шӧдылытэк/G1
шуыса/G1C1
эктыса/G1D1
айда/I1P1
аль-ляль-ля/I1
ат-ат-ат/I1
ау-у-у-а/I1
баб-баб/I1
блие-блие/I1
булай/I1
выжт/I1
дӥго-дӥго/I1
жонгыр/I1
зуб-зуб/I1
кош/I1
кыс-кыс/I1
лаб/I1
мась-мась/I1
нёшто/I1P1
ну/I1
ӧб-ӧб-ӧб/I1
однако-однако/I1C1
ой-драк/I1
ойы/I1
олӥ-и/I1
оллӥ-оллӥ/I1
ӧ-ӧ-ӧ/I1
ӧть-ӧть-ӧть/I1
ӧч-ӧч-ӧч/I1
пись-пись/I1
пырис/I1
тпру/I1
тпруке/I1
тьфу/I1
уй-уй-уй/I1
уть/I1N2
чаг-чаг/I1
чир-жаг/I1
чырс-пырс/I1
штыре/I1
ыш-ыш-ыш/I1
эк/I1
эккойна/I1
эк-эк-эк/I1
ялыке/I1
витетӥ/L1L2
вить/L1L2
вить-куать/L1L2
витьтон/L1L2
восьмой/L1L2
дас-кызь/L1L2
дасо/L1L2
даспуй/L1L2
дасэн-дасэн/L1L2D1
дасэтӥез/L1L2
киямыстас/L1L2
куамынэтӥ/L1L2
куатен-куатен/L1L2D1
куатетӥез/L1L2
куатьдас/L1L2
куатьтон/L1L2
куатьтонэтӥез/L1L2
куинетӥ/L1L2
куинь/L1L2
куиньметӥез/L1L2
куинь-ньыль/L1L2
кызетӥез/L1L2
кыкен/L1L2D1
кык-куинь/L1L2
кыктэтӥ/L1L2
миллион/L1L2
ньылетӥ/L1L2
ньыль-вить/L1L2
ньыльдонэтӥ/L1L2
оген/L1L2D1
огпасьта/L1L2A1A2D1
одӥген-одӥген/L1L2D1
одӥго/L1L2D1
сизьым/L1L2
сизьымдонэтӥез/L1L2
сю/L1L2
сюрсо/L1L2
сюэн/L1L2D1
триллион/L1L2
тямыстонэтӥ/L1L2
уик/L1L2
укмыстон/L1L2
аслыд/M1
асням/M1D1
асьмелэнъёсыз/M1
асьсэлэн/M1
асьтэлэсь/M1
ачизлэсь/M1
ваньды/M1
ваньмызлэсь/M1
витякой/M1
вочнамы/M1D1
всё/M1D1
кажной/M1
кӧняетӥез/M1
котькытчыозь/M1D1
куддырын/M1D1
кудмында/M1
кудъёс/M1C1
кытӥ/M1D1
кытысь-отысь/M1D1
маке/M1N4
марлы/M1
минням/M1D1
нема/M1
ненокытысен/M1D1
ниномыр/M1
нокытӥ/M1D1
огды-огды/M1L2D1
огнам/M1L2
олань/M1D1
олокытӥ-мар/M1D1
оломакемысь/M1D1
оломаркемын/M1D1
созь/M1D1
солэн/M1
со-та/M1
талань/M1D1
тӥледын/M1
тямысназы/M1L2D1
аграмант/N1N2
акцентология/N1N5
аноа/N1N2
артропластика/N1N2
бактериоскопия/N1N5
блейзер/N1N2
валькирия/N1N5
галоид/N1N2
геттер/N1N2
голотурия/N1N5
декреталия/N1N5
динарий/N1N2
зауролоф/N1N2
инсигния/N1N5
кампус/N1N2
кибуц/N1N2
кондом/N1N2
криптогам/N1N2
лейкемия/N1N5
маклюра/N1N2
металлография/N1N5
монорим/N1N2
нимфея/N1N2
ориктоценоз/N1N2
партеногенез/N1N2
пинцгау/N1N2
портвейн/N1N2
псевдомнезия/N1N5
реквием/N1N2
рюш/N1N2
симпатомиметик/N1N2
специя/N1N5
сутенёр/N1N2
тигель/N1N2
тузлук/N1N2
фибриноген/N1N2
фотоэффект/N1N2
цейхгауз/N1N2
шпат/N1N2
электротаксис/N1N2
эякуляция/N1N5
бай/N2A1A2
вадес/N8
вис/N8
гольыш/N2A1A2
зэмзэ/N2D1
йырпыдэс/N8
йыртыш/N0
кадет/N2A1A2
крепдошин/N2A1A2
мурт/N2A1A2
мыш/N0
нюлэс/N8A1A2
пул/N2A1A2
пуш/N0
пыдтыш/N0
тыш/N0
урдэс/N8A1A2P1
ыжгон/N2A1A2
кус/N8
инфляция/N5N7
презентация/N5N7
усиление/N5N7
стройиндустрия/N5N7
анаша/N7N2
бентонит/N7N2
буровик/N7N2
воинство/N7N2
гирлянда/N7N2
гуманность/N7N2
домрист/N7N2
завалинка/N7N2
зырянин/N7N2
капюшон/N7N2
колера/N7N2
круиз/N7N2
магарыч/N7N2
молочник/N7N2
недоросль/N7N2
окраина/N7N2
пастырь/N7N2
пляс/N7N2
поросёнок/N7N2
продавец/N7N2
разум/N7N2
самовольник/N7N2
синтез/N7N2
сопредседатель/N7N2
столярка/N7N2
телеведущий/N7N2
тупица/N7N2
филфак/N7N2
чабер/N7N2
экс-президент/N7N2
агрохимикат/N7N2
герундиум/N7N2
киноклуб/N7N2
мидгард/N7N2
перформанс/N7N2
роно/N7N2
фотоочерк/N7N2
коркасен/K1
коркасенызы/K1
коркасьтыд/K1
коркасьтым/K1
куаласеныд/K1
куаласеным/K1
куаласьтыз/K1
куартолэзь/K1
сюлмыз/K1
гинэ/P1C1
да/P1C1
оло/P1C1
только/P1C1
уго/P1C1
эсьма/P1C1
эсьмаса/P1C1
э-э/P1I1
я/P1I1C1
кельыштэм/R1D1
Автотрейд-Коми/J1
Аквасервис/J1
арриво/J1
Белочка/J1
БНКоми/J1
ВелоУхта/J1
военторг/J1
вындер/J1
Геотехпроект/J1
Горка/J1
госплан/J1
Дакор/J1
Домисолька/J1
Жальгирис/J1
зарнича/J1
ИжАвто/J1
Интауголь/J1
Камва/J1
Комби/J1
Комиконтакт/J1
Комипресс/J1
КомиФерма/J1
крайком/J1
Левантэ/J1
Ликор/J1
Любэ/J1
Милосердие/J1
Мосфильм/J1
обком/J1
панасоник/J1
Продторгком/J1
Релод/J1
Рослесхоз/J1
Ръченица/J1
Севлесфорест/J1
Союзохота/J1
Сыктывкареч/J1
Тпрутей/J1
уоно/J1
Фенноугрия/J1
Чоп-чо/J1
Юганскнефтегаз/J1
айиз/K1
баеныд/K1
бонди/K1
будэмъяз/G1
вачекыскон/K1
милямъёс/M1
ӵажгеса/G1
визьмыныд/K1 # визь
мыноме/K1 # мыныны
мынонъяз/K1 # мынон
визьмын/D1
шорсюлмыз/K1 # шорсюлэм
синмыныз/K1 # син
виёзы/K1 # виыны
огзэс/M1
муӵэз/K1 # муӵ
сюэз/K1 # сю
визьмызлы/K1 # визь
сэры/K1 # сэр
пиньыз/K1 # пинь
киыд-пыдыд/K1 # ки-пыд
ымныре/K1 # ымныр
сяменыд/K1 # сямен
йыре/K1 # йыр
шыдыз/K1 # шыд
кӧтыз/K1 # кӧт
куамынам/K1 # куамын
лымшорпалан/K1 # лымшорпал
вирен/K1 # вир
котькинлэн/K1 # котькин
гыркес/K1 # гырк
гажы/K1 # гаж
котькинлы/K1 # котькин
пельпумы/K1 # пельпум
вужередлэсь/K1 # вужер
кӧтурдсы/K1 # кӧтурдэс
тыккыры/K1 #
зэмбуро/A1A2 # С.М.
ожгаруж/K1 # С.М.
